Louisiana, session 2026, HB125.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:543(A) and 543.1 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
15:561.7(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§543. Duties of the courts, sheriffs, and the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections and the office of juvenile justice; informing the offender of the
registration and notification requirements
A. The court shall provide written notification to any person convicted of a
sex offense and a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor of the registration
requirements and the notification requirements of this Chapter. For purposes of this
Subsection, the court shall use the form contained in R.S. 15:543.1 and shall provide
a copy of the registration and notification statutes to the offender. Such notice shall
be included on any guilty plea forms and judgment and sentence forms provided to
the defendant, and an entry shall be made in the court minutes stating that the written
notification was provided to such offenders. If the offender is not sentenced to
incarceration, then the court shall notify the bureau of the conviction of the offender
and shall provide a copy of the completed form to the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, division of probation and parole.
* * *
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
§543.1. Written notification by the courts; form to be used
STATE V. ______________ ______ JUDICIAL DISTRICT COURT
DOCKET # __________ PARISH OF ___________________
DIVISION ______ STATE OF LOUISIANA
Notification to Sex Offender
In accordance with R.S. 15:543, this court has the duty to provide
_______________________ (name of offender) with the information necessary for
awareness of sex offender and child predator registration and notification
requirements as well as any applicable requirements of supervised release pursuant
to Chapter 3-E of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
_______________________ has pled guilty to, been found guilty of, or been
adjudicated delinquent of a violation of Title 14, Section ____ Subsection ____ of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. This crime of conviction or adjudication is:
( ) Under R.S. 15:541, defined as an aggravated offense or, with regard to
offenders adjudicated as juveniles, an offense listed in R.S. 15:542(A)(3) which,
pursuant to R.S. 15:544(B)(2)(a) or (b), requires lifetime registration and notification
under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
( ) A second conviction for an offense requiring registration and notification
under the provisions of Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 which, pursuant to R.S. 15:544(B)(2)(c), requires lifetime registration and
notification under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
( ) Under R.S. 15:541, defined as a sexual offense against a victim who is
a minor which, pursuant to R.S. 15:544(B)(1), requires 25 years of registration and
notification under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
( ) Is defined neither as an aggravated offense nor a sexual offense against
a victim who is a minor under R.S. 15:541 which, pursuant to R.S. 15:544(A),
requires 15 years of registration and notification under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
The above registration and notification periods shall begin to toll from the
date you are released from prison, from the date of being placed on parole,
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
supervised release or probation, or from the date of your conviction, if you are not
sentenced to a term of imprisonment or jail. Additionally, you have been convicted
of:
( ) An aggravated offense as defined in R.S. 15:541, you must update your
registration, in person, every ninety days from the date of initial registration, with the
appropriate law enforcement agencies as provided in R.S. 15:542.
( ) A sexual offense involving a victim who is a minor as defined in R.S.
15:541, you must update your registration, in person, every six months from the date
of initial registration, with the appropriate law enforcement agencies as provided in
R.S. 15:542.
( ) An offense not defined in R.S. 15:541 as an aggravated offense or a
sexual offense involving a victim who is a minor, you must update your registration,
in person, annually from the date of initial registration, with the appropriate law
enforcement agencies as provided in R.S. 15:542.
Additionally, if the offense that requires registration as a sex offender
involves a victim under the age of thirteen and you are incarcerated as a result of the
conviction for that offense, you are advised that you will be subjected to supervised
release pursuant to Chapter 3-E of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950
once you are released from incarceration. A copy of these statutes are provided to
you with this notification.
Based on the foregoing, you are hereby notified of the following:
(1) That you, within three (3) business days of establishing residence in
Louisiana or if a current resident, within three (3) business days after conviction or
adjudication if not immediately incarcerated or taken into custody, or within three
(3) business days after release from confinement, shall obtain and provide the
following information to each sheriff or police department in accordance with R.S.
15:542(B) (except in Orleans Parish where registration shall take place with the New
Orleans Police Department):
(a) Name and any aliases used by you.
(b) Physical address or addresses of residence.
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
(c) Name and physical address of place of employment. If you do not have
a fixed place of employment, you shall provide information with as much specificity
as possible regarding the places where you work, including but not limited to travel
routes used by you.
(d) Name and physical address of the school in which you are a student.
(e) Two forms of proof of residence for each residential address provided,
including but not limited to a driver's license, bill for utility service, and bill for
telephone service. If those forms of proof of residence are not available, you may
provide an affidavit of an adult resident living at the same address. The affidavit
shall certify that the affiant understands his obligation to provide written notice
pursuant to R.S. 15:542.1.4 to the appropriate law enforcement agency with whom
you last registered when you no longer reside at the residence provided in the
affidavit.
(f) The crime for which you were convicted and the date and place of such
conviction, and if known by you, the court in which the conviction was obtained, the
docket number of the case, the specific statute under which you were convicted, and
the sentence imposed.
(g) A current photograph, fingerprints, palm prints, and a DNA sample.
(h) Telephone numbers, including fixed location phone and mobile phone
numbers assigned to you or associated with your residence address.
(i) A description of every motorized vehicle registered to or operated by you,
including license plate number and vehicle identification number, and a copy of your
driver's license and identification card. This information should always be provided
before the vehicle is operated and, if the vehicle is registered to you, no more than
three days after the vehicle is registered, even if it has not yet been operated.
(j) Social security number and date of birth.
(k) A description of your physical characteristics, including but not limited
to sex, race, hair color, eye color, height, age, weight, scars, tattoos, or other
identifying marks on your body.
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
(l) Every e-mail address, online screen name, or other online identity used
by you to communicate on the Internet.
(m)(i) Temporary lodging information regarding any place where you plan
to stay for seven or more days and the length of the stay. This information shall be
provided at least three days prior to the date of departure unless an emergency
situation has prevented the timely disclosure of the information.
(ii) Temporary lodging information regarding international travel shall be
provided regardless of the number of days or nights you plan to stay. This
information shall be provided at least twenty-one days prior to the date of departure
unless an emergency situation has prevented the timely disclosure of the information.
Upon receipt of this information by the bureau from the law enforcement agency,
this information shall then be sent by the bureau to the United States Marshals
Service's National Sex Offender Targeting Center for transmission to the proper
authorities.
(n) Travel and immigration documents, including but not limited to passports
and documents establishing immigration status.
(o) A state sex offender identification card from the office of motor vehicles.
(2) You shall register with the sheriff and police chief in each parish and
municipality where you maintain your residence(s) and with the sheriff of the parish
in which you are employed and attend school in accordance with R.S. 15:542. For
initial registration only, you, if you are not immediately taken into physical custody,
shall register on the date of conviction or adjudication with the sheriff in the parish
of your conviction or adjudication in accordance with R.S. 15:542. If you live, work,
or attend school in Orleans Parish, however, you shall register with the New Orleans
Police Department and not with the sheriff of that parish.
(3) If you are incarcerated as a result of the crime, you shall provide all
information listed in Paragraph (1) of this Section to the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, or if a juvenile, to the office of juvenile justice, within ten (10) days
prior to release from confinement. You shall still appear in person at the sheriff's
office within three (3) business days of release from confinement. You shall register
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
with the sheriff of the parish in which the residence address you initially supplied to
the department is located, unless the residence has changed and you have registered
with the sheriff of the parish in which the new residence address is located.
(4) During the declaration of an emergency, if you enter an emergency
shelter you shall, within the first twenty-four (24) hours of admittance, notify the
management of the facility, the chief of police of the municipality, and the sheriff of
the parish in which the shelter is located of your sex offender status in accordance
with R.S. 15:543.2.
(5) You have a duty to provide notice of change of address or other
registration information to the sheriff of the parish of residence within three business
days. If the new or additional residence is located in a different parish, then you
must register with the sheriff of the parish in which the new or additional residence
is located. You shall also send written notice within three business days of re-
registering in the new parish to the sheriff of the parish of former registration in
accordance with R.S. 15:542.1.2. If the new address is situated within a
municipality, you must also register with the police department of that municipality
within three business days of establishing the residence.
(6) You shall give notice of the crime for which you were convicted, your
name, address, a physical description, and a photograph to the following in
accordance with R.S. 15:542.1:
(a) At least one person in every residence or business within a one-mile
radius in a rural area and a three-tenths of a mile radius in an urban or suburban area
of the address of the residence where you will reside upon release, including all adult
residents of your residence.
(b) The superintendent of the school district where you will reside.
(c) The lessor, landlord, or owner of the residence or the property on which
you reside.
(d) The superintendent of the park, playground, and recreation districts
within the designated area where you will reside only if the victim was under
eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the commission of the offense.
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
*Any person convicted of a violation of R.S. 14:89 shall not have to include
a photograph in the notice described in Paragraph (6).
*Juveniles adjudicated for a crime requiring registration DO NOT have to
provide this community notice.
(7) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1, community notification shall be given
by mail within twenty-one days of the date of conviction, if you are not taken into
custody at the time of conviction, and within twenty-one days of the date of release
from confinement if sentenced to a term of imprisonment. This notification shall
also occur within twenty-one days of each time you change residence within twenty-
one days of establishing residency in the new locale. This notification shall also
occur at least every five years, whether or not you change residences. This
notification shall occur in each jurisdiction in which you regularly reside.
*Juveniles adjudicated for a crime requiring registration DO NOT have to
provide this community notice.
(8) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1, community notice shall be published
on two (2) separate days within this period in the official journal of the governing
authority of the parish where you plan to reside, unless ordered to be published in a
different journal or newspaper by the sheriff or local ordinance.
*Those convicted of R.S. 14:92(A)(7) are not required to publish notice in
the newspaper or official journal as provided in Paragraph (8).
*Juveniles who are adjudicated for a crime requiring registration DO NOT
have to provide this community notice.
(9) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1(B), an offender who provides
recreational instruction to persons under the age of seventeen (17) shall post a notice
in the building or facility where such instruction is being given. This notice shall
contain your name and photograph, the date and jurisdiction of conviction, and the
crime for which you were convicted.
(10) In accordance with R.S. 15:542(C)(2), you must, within ten (10) days
prior to release from a correctional facility, provide a photograph and all other
required registration information to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
or if a juvenile, to the office of juvenile justice for purposes of the State Sex
Offender and Child Predator Registry. Providing false information during this
process constitutes failure to register exposing you to prosecution and the penalties
detailed at the end of this document. The address provided to the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections through this process shall be presumed to be your
residence address. In accordance with R.S. 15:542(C)(2), you must register with the
sheriff of the parish in which this address is located within three business days of
your release from confinement, whether or not you actually establish a residence
there, unless you establish a residence elsewhere AND register with that jurisdiction
within three business days of your release from confinement. Failure to do so is a
violation of the registration statutes and will subject you to prosecution under R.S.
15:542.1.4.
(11) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1.2, if you change your place of
residence or establish a new or additional residence, you shall appear in person at the
office of the sheriff of your parish of residence where you are currently registered
within three (3) business days of the change to register the new address. If the new
address is located in a different parish, then you shall also appear in person at the
office of the sheriff of your new parish of residence within the same time period. If
your parish of residence is in Orleans Parish, then the registration shall take place at
the New Orleans Police Department and not with the Orleans Parish Sheriff.
(12) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1.2, if you are absent from your current
address of registration for more than thirty (30) consecutive days or an aggregate of
thirty (30) days or more in a calendar year, and are physically present at another
address during that same period of time, you shall register in person the new address
as one of your addresses of residence. If the new address is in a parish different from
your current address, you shall also register in person with the sheriff of the new
parish within three (3) business days of the tolling of the time periods listed. This
requirement notwithstanding, you shall still notify the sheriff of one of your parishes
of residence in person if you are to take up temporary lodging for seven (7) or more
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
days. It is only after the thirty-day limit is exceeded that the new registration shall
occur.
(13) You shall also appear in person at the office of the sheriff of any of your
parishes of residence when there is a change in your name, place of employment, or
enrollment. This appearance shall occur within three (3) business days of the
change. If your address of residence is in Orleans Parish, this registration update
shall take place at the New Orleans Police Department and not with the Orleans
Parish Sheriff's Office.
(14) You shall be prohibited from certain types of employment in accordance
with R.S. 15:553 for the duration of the registration period. A copy of this statute
is provided to you with this notification.
(15) In accordance with R.S. 15:542(C), you shall update your registration
annually on the anniversary of the initial registration by appearing in person at the
office of each law enforcement agency with which you are required to register and
shall pay an annual registration fee of sixty dollars ($60.00).
(16) Failure to comply with any of these registration and notification
requirements is a felony for which you shall be punished by a fine of up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and imprisonment at hard labor for not less than two
years nor more than ten years without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of
sentence. Upon a second or subsequent conviction, you shall be punished by a fine
of up to three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) and imprisonment at hard labor for not
less than five years, nor more than twenty years without benefit of parole, probation,
or suspension of sentence.
(17) For those offenders who have been convicted of a sex offense as defined
in R.S. 15:541 involving a victim who was under the age of thirteen (13) at the time
of the offense, R.S. 14:91.2 is applicable which prohibits such offenders from
residing or being present in certain locations. A copy of this statute is provided to
you with this notification.
(18) For those offenders who have been convicted of R.S. 14:81 (indecent
behavior with juveniles), R.S. 14:81.1 (pornography involving juveniles) which
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
occurred prior to August 1, 2025, R.S. 14:81.1 (child sexual abuse materials) which
occurred on or after August 1, 2025, R.S. 14:81.3 (computer-aided solicitation of a
minor), or R.S. 14:283 (video voyeurism) or have been convicted of a sex offense
as defined in R.S. 15:541 in which the victim of the sex offense was a minor, R.S.
14:91.5, which prohibits such offenders from using certain social networking
websites, is applicable. A copy of this statute is provided to you with this
notification.
THUS DONE AND SIGNED this ____ day of _____________, 20___ in
open court, in_____________, Louisiana.
______________________________
Judge, ____ Judicial District Court
I hereby certify that the above requirements have been explained to me, that
I have received a copy of the above notice of sex offender registration and
notification requirements, and a copy of the statutes providing for such requirements.
I also understand that I will be subject to any changes made by the legislature to the
registration laws from this day forward.
___________________________
(Name of Sex Offender)
____________________________
Defense Counsel Signature
* * *
§561.7. Failure to comply with provisions conditions of supervised release
* * *
C. In addition to any venue provided by the Code of Criminal Procedure, a
violation of this Section may be prosecuted in the parish where the violation
occurred.
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 611(F) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 611. Venue; trial where offense committed
* * *
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 125 ENROLLED
F. If the offender is charged with a violation of R.S. 15:561.7 for the failure
to comply with the conditions of his supervised release as provided in R.S. 15:561.5,
the violation is deemed to have been committed in either of the following:
(1) The parish of the court that placed the offender on supervised release.
(2) The parish where any act or element constituting the basis for the
violation occurred.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.